Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1510
Instruments; endorsement, recording,
and indexing; required information.

(1) The register
of deeds shall endorse upon every instrument properly filed in his or her
office for recording the minute, hour,
day, month, and year when it was so filed and shall forthwith enter the same
in the proper indices provided
for in sections 23-1508 to
23-1517.02.

(2) Every instrument presented for recording
shall have, on the first page below the three-inch margin prescribed in section
23-1503.01, the following information:

(a) A return address;
and

(b)
The title of the instrument.

(3) After
the instrument has been recorded,
the book and page or computer system reference where it may be found shall
be endorsed thereon.

Laws 1885, c. 41, § 5, p. 222;

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 7, p. 366;

R.S.1913, § 5625;

C.S.1922, § 4952;

C.S.1929, § 26-1210;

R.S.1943, § 23-1510;

Laws 1984, LB 679, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB254, § 3.

Certificate of filing of instrument for record is sufficient prima facie proof that document was so filed. Smith Bros. v. Woodward, 94 Neb. 298, 143 N.W. 196 (1913).